Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2516
Certificate of inspection; issuance; form.

Upon a conveyance passing an inspection under section 48-2513, 48-2514, or 48-2515 and receipt of the inspection fee, the commissioner shall issue the owner or user of the conveyance a certificate of inspection, upon forms prescribed by the commissioner.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 16.